District of Columbia statutes.
22-3806

Examination by psychiatrists.

(a)

When a statement has been filed with the clerk of any court pursuant to § 22-3804, such court shall appoint 2 qualified psychiatrists to make a personal examination of the patient. The patient shall be required to answer questions asked by the psychiatrists under penalty of contempt of court. Each psychiatrist shall file a written report of the examination, which shall include a statement of his or her conclusion as to whether the patient is a sexual psychopath.

(b)

The counsel for the patient shall have the right to inspect the reports of the examination of the patient. No such report and no evidence resulting from the personal examination of the patient shall be admissible against him or her in any judicial proceeding except a proceeding under this chapter to determine whether the patient is a sexual psychopath.

History

June 9, 1948, 62 Stat. 348, ch. 428, title II, § 204
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 20(d), 41 DCR 1639

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-3805, § 22-3807, and § 22-3808.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3506.
1973 Ed., § 22-3506.